District of Columbia statutes.
42-3806

Assistance available for Metropolitan police officers.

Repealed.

June 11, 1992, D.C. Law 9-118, § 6a
as added Feb. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-70, § 8(b), 40 DCR 7575
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 1101, 44 DCR 7378

Mayor authorized to issue rules: Section 5 of D.C. Law 10-70 provided that the Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue rules within 90 days after February 23, 1994, to implement the provisions of this chapter. The rules shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Mayor authorized to issue rules: (1) An application procedure for the Metropolitan Police Housing Assistance Program; and.

(2) A standard of eligibility and selection of Metropolitan Police Housing Assistance Program applicants. The Mayor may establish priorities for eligibility based on length of residency in the District, geographic location, or other means as deemed appropriate.

D.C. Law 12-59, title XI, § 1101 ( 44 DCR 7356), eff. March 20, 1998, provided for the temporary repeal of §§ 45-2221 to 45-2226 [1981 Ed.]. Section 2001(b) of D.C. Law 12-59 provided for expiration “after 225 days of its having taken effect.”

For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 2 of the Government Employer-Assisted Housing Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-258, February 9, 2000, 47 DCR 1124).
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 2 of the Government Employer-Assisted Housing Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-188, December 1, 1999, 46 DCR 10407).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 6(b) of Metropolitan Police Housing Assistance Program and Community Safety Temporary Act of 1993 (D.C. Law 10-63, October 8, 1993, law notification 40 DCR ]).
1981 Ed., § 45-2226.